Nebraska, session 109, LB1221.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1221 LB1221
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-901 Sections 68-901 to 68-9,111 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Medical Assistance Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of implementing and administering the federal
One Big Beautiful Bill Act, Public Law 119-21, as such act existed on
January 1, 2026, the department shall adopt the following definitions for
purposes of community engagement or work requirements for individuals who
experience a short-term hardship event:
(1) Extended period of time means (a) one or more overnight stays,
(b) repeated travel of two or more trips, or (c) sustained absence from
the individual's residence that reasonably interferes with the ability to
meet community engagement requirements;
(2) Inpatient hospital services means services provided to an
individual who is admitted as an inpatient to a hospital under a
physician or other health care provider order, consistent with 42 C.F.R.
412.3. Inpatient hospital services are deemed to occur beginning on the
date of admission, regardless of length of stay, and include any
associated outpatient, observation, diagnostic, recovery, or follow-up
care related to such admission;
(3) Outside of the individual's community means travel outside of
the individual's county of residence; and
(4) Serious or complex medical condition means an individual who has
one or more of the conditions described in 42 C.F.R. 440.315, including
any condition for which medicaid coverage is medically necessary.
Sec. 3. Original section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-